Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3218
Members of board; compensation; expenses.

Board members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with their duties. Each board may provide a per diem payment for directors not to exceed seventy dollars for each day that a director attends meetings of the board or is engaged in matters concerning the district, but no director shall receive more than three thousand six hundred dollars in any one year. Such per diem payments shall be in addition to and separate from reimbursement for expenses.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 18, p. 113;

Laws 1972, LB 543, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 10;

Laws 1986, LB 374, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 264, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 134, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 32, § 1.